dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Fc Y 17
SFX Fc 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fc o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fc o a/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesa/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žese/xPxE .
SFX Fc o 0 .
SFX Fc go žes/xPxE .
SFX Fc o u/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesi/xPxE .
SFX Fc o ah/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesah/xPxE .
SFX Fc o am/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesam/xPxE .
SFX Fc 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesem/xPxE .
SFX Fc o ami/xPxE .
SFX Fc go žesami/xPxE .

SFX Fd Y 10
SFX Fd 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fd 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Fd ec ce/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec ca/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cev/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cu/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cah/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cam/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cem/xPxE .
SFX Fd ec cami/xPxE .

SFX Fe Y 11
SFX Fe 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Fe 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Fe ek ky/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek ka/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek kov/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek ku/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek kah/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek kam/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek kom/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek kami/xPxE .
SFX Fe ek če/xPxE .

SFX Ff Y 62
SFX Ff ti l .
SFX Ff ti la .
SFX Ff ti lo .
SFX Ff ti li .
SFX Ff lati olju .
SFX Ff lati oljem .
SFX Ff lati olješ .
SFX Ff lati olje .
SFX Ff lati oljemo .
SFX Ff lati oljete .
SFX Ff lati oljut .
SFX Ff ti h .
SFX Ff ti še .
SFX Ff ti hmo .
SFX Ff ti ste .
SFX Ff ti hu .
SFX Ff lati olj .
SFX Ff lati oljmo .
SFX Ff lati oljte .
SFX Ff lati oljuči .
SFX Ff lati oljučego .
SFX Ff lati oljučemu .
SFX Ff lati oljučim .
SFX Ff lati oljučem .
SFX Ff lati oljučih .
SFX Ff lati oljučimi .
SFX Ff lati oljuča .
SFX Ff lati oljuču .
SFX Ff lati oljučej .
SFX Ff lati oljučeju .
SFX Ff lati oljuče .
SFX Ff lati oljemy .
SFX Ff lati oljemogo .
SFX Ff lati oljemomu .
SFX Ff lati oljemym .
SFX Ff lati oljemom .
SFX Ff lati oljemo .
SFX Ff lati oljema .
SFX Ff lati oljemu .
SFX Ff lati oljemoj .
SFX Ff lati oljemoju .
SFX Ff lati oljemi .
SFX Ff lati oljeme .
SFX Ff lati oljemyh .
SFX Ff lati oljemym .
SFX Ff lati oljemymi .
SFX Ff ti vši .
SFX Ff ti všego .
SFX Ff ti všemu .
SFX Ff ti všim .
SFX Ff ti všem .
SFX Ff ti vših .
SFX Ff ti všimi .
SFX Ff ti vša .
SFX Ff ti všu .
SFX Ff ti všej .
SFX Ff ti všeju .
SFX Ff ti vše .
SFX Ff i y .
SFX Ff i a .
SFX Ff i o .
SFX Ff i je .

SFX Fg Y 80
SFX Fg ti l .
SFX Fg ti la .
SFX Fg ti lo .
SFX Fg ti li .
SFX Fg skočiti u .
SFX Fg skočiti em .
SFX Fg skočiti eš .
SFX Fg skočiti e .
SFX Fg skočiti emo .
SFX Fg skočiti ete .
SFX Fg skočiti ut .
SFX Fg ti h .
SFX Fg ti še .
SFX Fg ti hmo .
SFX Fg ti ste .
SFX Fg ti hu .
SFX Fg skočiti j .
SFX Fg skočiti jmo .
SFX Fg skočiti jte .
SFX Fg skočiti juči .
SFX Fg skočiti jučego .
SFX Fg skočiti jučemu .
SFX Fg skočiti jučim .
SFX Fg skočiti jučem .
SFX Fg skočiti jučih .
SFX Fg skočiti jučimi .
SFX Fg skočiti juča .
SFX Fg skočiti juču .
SFX Fg skočiti jučej .
SFX Fg skočiti jučeju .
SFX Fg skočiti juče .
SFX Fg skočiti emy .
SFX Fg skočiti emogo .
SFX Fg skočiti emomu .
SFX Fg skočiti emym .
SFX Fg skočiti emom .
SFX Fg skočiti emo .
SFX Fg skočiti ema .
SFX Fg skočiti emu .
SFX Fg skočiti emoj .
SFX Fg skočiti emoju .
SFX Fg skočiti emi .
SFX Fg skočiti eme .
SFX Fg skočiti emyh .
SFX Fg skočiti emym .
SFX Fg skočiti emymi .
SFX Fg ti vši .
SFX Fg ti všego .
SFX Fg ti všemu .
SFX Fg ti všim .
SFX Fg ti všem .
SFX Fg ti vših .
SFX Fg ti všimi .
SFX Fg ti vša .
SFX Fg ti všu .
SFX Fg ti všej .
SFX Fg ti všeju .
SFX Fg ti vše .
SFX Fg iti eny .
SFX Fg iti enogo .
SFX Fg iti enomu .
SFX Fg iti enym .
SFX Fg iti enom .
SFX Fg iti eni .
SFX Fg iti ene .
SFX Fg iti enyh .
SFX Fg iti enymi .
SFX Fg iti ena .
SFX Fg iti enu .
SFX Fg iti enoj .
SFX Fg iti enoju .
SFX Fg iti eno .
SFX Fg iti enje/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enja/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enju/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enjem/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enij/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enjam/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enjami/xPxE .
SFX Fg iti enjah/xPxE .

SFX Fh Y 80
SFX Fh ti l .
SFX Fh ti la .
SFX Fh ti lo .
SFX Fh ti li .
SFX Fh tati ču .
SFX Fh tati čem .
SFX Fh tati češ .
SFX Fh tati če .
SFX Fh tati čemo .
SFX Fh tati čete .
SFX Fh tati čut .
SFX Fh ti h .
SFX Fh ti še .
SFX Fh ti hmo .
SFX Fh ti ste .
SFX Fh ti hu .
SFX Fh tati či .
SFX Fh tati čimo .
SFX Fh tati čite .
SFX Fh tati čuči .
SFX Fh tati čučego .
SFX Fh tati čučemu .
SFX Fh tati čučim .
SFX Fh tati čučem .
SFX Fh tati čučih .
SFX Fh tati čučimi .
SFX Fh tati čuča .
SFX Fh tati čuču .
SFX Fh tati čučej .
SFX Fh tati čučeju .
SFX Fh tati čuče .
SFX Fh tati čemy .
SFX Fh tati čemogo .
SFX Fh tati čemomu .
SFX Fh tati čemym .
SFX Fh tati čemom .
SFX Fh tati čemo .
SFX Fh tati čema .
SFX Fh tati čemu .
SFX Fh tati čemoj .
SFX Fh tati čemoju .
SFX Fh tati čemi .
SFX Fh tati čeme .
SFX Fh tati čemyh .
SFX Fh tati čemym .
SFX Fh tati čemymi .
SFX Fh ti vši .
SFX Fh ti všego .
SFX Fh ti všemu .
SFX Fh ti všim .
SFX Fh ti všem .
SFX Fh ti vših .
SFX Fh ti všimi .
SFX Fh ti vša .
SFX Fh ti všu .
SFX Fh ti všej .
SFX Fh ti všeju .
SFX Fh ti vše .
SFX Fh ti ny .
SFX Fh ti nogo .
SFX Fh ti nomu .
SFX Fh ti nym .
SFX Fh ti nom .
SFX Fh ti ni .
SFX Fh ti ne .
SFX Fh ti nyh .
SFX Fh ti nymi .
SFX Fh ti na .
SFX Fh ti nu .
SFX Fh ti noj .
SFX Fh ti noju .
SFX Fh ti no .
SFX Fh ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Fh ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Fi Y 68
SFX Fi ti l .
SFX Fi ti la .
SFX Fi ti lo .
SFX Fi ti li .
SFX Fi cati ču .
SFX Fi ati im .
SFX Fi ati iš .
SFX Fi ati i .
SFX Fi ati imo .
SFX Fi ati ite .
SFX Fi ati et .
SFX Fi ti h .
SFX Fi ti še .
SFX Fi ti hmo .
SFX Fi ti ste .
SFX Fi ti hu .
SFX Fi ati eči .
SFX Fi ati eča .
SFX Fi ati eče .
SFX Fi ati imy .
SFX Fi ati imogo .
SFX Fi ati imomu .
SFX Fi ati imym .
SFX Fi ati imom .
SFX Fi ati imo .
SFX Fi ati ima .
SFX Fi ati imu .
SFX Fi ati imoj .
SFX Fi ati imoju .
SFX Fi ati imi .
SFX Fi ati ime .
SFX Fi ati imyh .
SFX Fi ati imym .
SFX Fi ati imymi .
SFX Fi ti vši .
SFX Fi ti všego .
SFX Fi ti všemu .
SFX Fi ti všim .
SFX Fi ti všem .
SFX Fi ti vših .
SFX Fi ti všimi .
SFX Fi ti vša .
SFX Fi ti všu .
SFX Fi ti všej .
SFX Fi ti všeju .
SFX Fi ti vše .
SFX Fi ti ny .
SFX Fi ti nogo .
SFX Fi ti nomu .
SFX Fi ti nym .
SFX Fi ti nom .
SFX Fi ti ni .
SFX Fi ti ne .
SFX Fi ti nyh .
SFX Fi ti nymi .
SFX Fi ti na .
SFX Fi ti nu .
SFX Fi ti noj .
SFX Fi ti noju .
SFX Fi ti no .
SFX Fi ti nje/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti nja/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti nju/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti njem/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti njam/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti njami/xPxE .
SFX Fi ti njah/xPxE .

SFX Fj Y 71
SFX Fj ti l .
SFX Fj egti gla .
SFX Fj egti glo .
SFX Fj egti gli .
SFX Fj egti gu .
SFX Fj egti žem .
SFX Fj egti žeš .
SFX Fj egti že .
SFX Fj egti žemo .
SFX Fj egti žete .
SFX Fj egti gut .
SFX Fj egti žeh .
SFX Fj egti žeše .
SFX Fj egti žehmo .
SFX Fj egti žeste .
SFX Fj egti žehu .
SFX Fj egti ži .
SFX Fj egti žimo .
SFX Fj egti žite .
SFX Fj egti guči .
SFX Fj egti gučego .
SFX Fj egti gučemu .
SFX Fj egti gučim .
SFX Fj egti gučem .
SFX Fj egti gučih .
SFX Fj egti gučimi .
SFX Fj egti guča .
SFX Fj egti guču .
SFX Fj egti gučej .
SFX Fj egti gučeju .
SFX Fj egti guče .
SFX Fj egti žemy .
SFX Fj egti žemogo .
SFX Fj egti žemomu .
SFX Fj egti žemym .
SFX Fj egti žemom .
SFX Fj egti žemo .
SFX Fj egti žema .
SFX Fj egti žemu .
SFX Fj egti žemoj .
SFX Fj egti žemoju .
SFX Fj egti žemi .
SFX Fj egti žeme .
SFX Fj egti žemyh .
SFX Fj egti žemym .
SFX Fj egti žemymi .
SFX Fj ti ši .
SFX Fj ti ša .
SFX Fj ti še .
SFX Fj egti ženy .
SFX Fj egti ženogo .
SFX Fj egti ženomu .
SFX Fj egti ženym .
SFX Fj egti ženom .
SFX Fj egti ženi .
SFX Fj egti žene .
SFX Fj egti ženyh .
SFX Fj egti ženymi .
SFX Fj egti žena .
SFX Fj egti ženu .
SFX Fj egti ženoj .
SFX Fj egti ženoju .
SFX Fj egti ženo .
SFX Fj egti ženje/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženja/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženju/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženjem/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženij/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženjam/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženjami/xPxE .
SFX Fj egti ženjah/xPxE .
