dictionaries/isv_latcyr_hunspell_dict.dic
igo/Fc
jasenec/Fd
kabaček/Fe
klati/Ff
lanjec/Fd
naklati/Ff
naskočiti/Fg
našeptati/Fh
oblaček/Fe
obscati/Fi
obžegti/Fj
razklati/Ff
razžegti/Fj
jezyček/Fe
zaklati/Ff
uklati/Ff
žegti/Fj
sožegti/Fj
zažegti/Fj
šeptati/Fh
scati/Fi
nascati/Fi
ščekotati/Fh
loskotati/Fh
